Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2216.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 2, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-217.03, to read: START_STATUTE15-217.03. Trade pathways diploma program; requirements; annual report A. Not later than July 1, 2027, the state board of education shall establish a trade pathways diploma program for high school students who seek to enter a construction, electrical, plumbing, mechanical or utility-infrastructure trade.  The state board shall consult with the DEPARTMENT of education, trade schools, registered apprenticeship programs, community colleges as defined in section 15-1401, the Department of Economic Security, employers in this state and career and technical education providers to determine the minimum credits, courses, competencies and experiences required for a high school student to earn a diploma through the trade pathways diploma program. The minimum competencies for the trade pathways diploma program must align with industry demand and in-demand career fields.  The minimum course of study for the trade pathways diploma program must: 1. Require not more than two credits in mathematics and two credits in science during grades nine through twelve. 2. Allow students to earn credits that apply toward high school graduation through: (a) Career and technical education courses that meet any of the following: (i) Lead to certification or industry-recognized credentials. (ii) Lead to employment. (iii) Are related to a high demand career field. (b) A paid internship, training or other work-based learning program, subject to industry standard wages. (c) An apprenticeship program that is registered and certified with the United States secretary of labor under section 1 of the national apprenticeship act (50 Stat. 664; 29 United States Code section 50), subject to industry standard wages. (d) Community college courses. (e) Notwithstanding section 15-901.08, remote instruction. B. The state board of education, trade schools, community colleges, the Department of Economic Security and career and technical education providers shall cooperate to operate a statewide trade pathways system to facilitate the transfer of high school students to community colleges, apprenticeship programs and vocational programs without loss of credit. C. The Office of Economic Opportunity may allocate a portion of federal workforce development dollars to incentivize employers to provide registered apprenticeship programs and other work-based programs to high school students through the trade pathways diploma program. D. On or before December 1, 2029 and December 1 of each year thereafter, the department of education shall submit a report to the speaker of the house of representatives, president of the senate, the governor and the secretary of state that includes the following information for the immediately preceding fiscal year: 1. the number of students who participated in the trade pathways diploma program. 2. the number of credentials that students earned through the trade pathways diploma program. 3. the employer retention rates of students who earned a trade pathways diploma one year after graduation and two years after graduation. 4. the average wages of students who participate in the trade pathways diploma program. E. Each school district, charter school, community college and apprenticeship program that offers instruction through the trade pathways diploma program shall provide to the department of education any data and information necessary for the report required by subsection D of this section. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 15-701.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-701.01. High schools; graduation; requirements; community college or university courses; transfer from other schools; academic credit; report A. The state board of education shall: 1. Prescribe a minimum course of study that incorporates the academic standards adopted by the state board for the graduation of pupils from high school. 2. Prescribe competency requirements for the graduation of pupils from high school incorporating the academic standards in at least the areas of reading, writing, mathematics, science and social studies. The academic standards prescribed by the state board in social studies shall include personal finance, American civics education and a comparative discussion of political ideologies, such as communism and totalitarianism, that conflict with the principles of freedom and democracy that are essential to the founding principles of the United States.  The state board may consider establishing a required separate personal finance course for the purpose of the graduation of pupils from high school. The state board shall require at least one-half of a course credit in economics, which shall include financial literacy and personal financial management. 3. Through the graduating class of 2025, include in the competency requirements for social studies prescribed in paragraph 2 of this subsection a requirement that, in order to graduate from high school or obtain a high school equivalency diploma, a pupil must correctly answer at least sixty of the one hundred questions listed on a test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States citizenship and immigration services. Beginning with the graduating class of 2026, the state board shall include in the competency requirements for social studies prescribed in paragraph 2 of this subsection a requirement that, in order to graduate from high school or obtain a high school equivalency diploma, a pupil must correctly answer at least seventy of the one hundred questions listed on a test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States citizenship and immigration services.  A district school or charter school shall document on the pupil's transcript only a pass or fail designation that the pupil has passed or failed the test required by this paragraph. A pupil in grade seven or eight may take the test described in this paragraph, and if the pupil correctly answers at least seventy of the one hundred questions on the test: (a) The district school or charter school shall document on the pupil's transcript only a pass or fail designation that the pupil has passed or failed the test required by this paragraph. (b) The pupil is not required to take the test required by this paragraph again in high school. 4. Develop and adopt competency tests pursuant to section 15-741.  English language learners who are subject to article 3.1 of this chapter are subject to the assessments prescribed in section 15-741. B. The governing board of a school district shall: 1. Prescribe curricula that include the academic standards in the required subject areas pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 1 of this section. 2. Prescribe criteria for the graduation of pupils from the high schools in the school district. These criteria shall include accomplishment of the academic standards in at least reading, writing, mathematics, science and social studies, as determined by district assessment. Other criteria may include additional measures of academic achievement and attendance. Pursuant to the prescribed graduation requirements adopted by the state board of education, the governing board may approve a rigorous computer science course that would fulfill a mathematics course required for graduation from high school. The governing board may approve a rigorous computer science course only if the rigorous computer science course includes significant mathematics content and the governing board determines the high school where the rigorous computer science course is offered has sufficient capacity, infrastructure and qualified staff, including competent teachers of computer science.  The school district governing board or charter school governing body may determine the method and manner in which to administer a test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States citizenship and immigration services.  A pupil who does not obtain a passing score on the test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test may retake the test until the pupil obtains a passing score. C. The governing board of a school district may prescribe the course of study and competency requirements for the graduation of pupils from high school that are in addition to or higher than the course of study and competency requirements that the state board prescribes. D. The governing board of a school district may prescribe competency requirements for the passage of pupils in courses that are required for graduation from high school. E. A teacher shall determine whether to pass or fail a pupil in a course in high school on the basis of the competency requirements, if any have been prescribed. The governing board of a school district, if it reviews the decision of a teacher to pass or fail a pupil in a course in high school as provided in section 15-342, paragraph 11, shall base its decision on the competency requirements, if any have been prescribed. F. Graduation requirements established by the governing board of a school district may be met by a pupil who passes courses in the required or elective subjects at a community college or university, if the course is at a higher level than the course taught in the high school attended by the pupil or, if the course is not taught in the high school, the level of the course is equal to or higher than the level of a high school course. The governing board shall determine whether the subject matter of the community college or university course is appropriate to the specific requirement the pupil intends it to fulfill and whether the level of the community college or university course is less than, equal to or higher than a high school course, and the governing board shall award at least one-half of a Carnegie unit and up to and including one Carnegie unit for each three semester hours of credit that the pupil earns in an appropriate community college or university course. If a pupil is not satisfied with the decision of the governing board regarding the amount of credit granted or the subjects for which credit is granted, the pupil may request that the state board of education review the decision of the governing board, and the state board shall make the final determination of the amount of credit to be given the pupil and for which subjects. The governing board shall not limit the number of credits that is required for high school graduation and that may be met by taking community college or university courses.  For the purposes of this subsection: 1. "Community college" means an educational institution that is operated by a community college district as defined in section 15-1401 or a postsecondary educational institution under the jurisdiction of an Indian tribe recognized by the United States department of the interior. 2. "University" means a university under the jurisdiction of the Arizona board of regents. G. A pupil who transfers from a private school shall be provided with a list that indicates those credits that have been accepted and denied by the school district. A pupil may request to take an examination in each particular course in which credit has been denied. The school district shall accept the credit for each particular course in which the pupil takes an examination and receives a passing score on a test designed and evaluated by a teacher in the school district who teaches the subject matter on which the examination is based. In addition to the above requirements, the governing board of a school district may prescribe requirements for the acceptance of the credits of pupils who transfer from a private school. H. If a pupil who was previously enrolled in a charter school or school district enrolls in a school district in this state, the school district shall accept credits earned by the pupil in courses or instructional programs at the charter school or school district. The governing board of a school district may adopt a policy concerning the application of transfer credits for the purpose of determining whether a credit earned by a pupil who was previously enrolled in a school district or charter school will be assigned as an elective or core credit. A school district or charter school may note the learning outcomes that a student mastered as prescribed in the rules adopted pursuant to section 15-203, subsection A, paragraph 38 to provide a record of the demonstrated competencies and award partial credit. I. A pupil who transfers credit from a charter school, a school district or Arizona online instruction shall be provided with a list that indicates which credits have been accepted as elective credits and which credits have been accepted as core credits by the school district or charter school. Within ten school days after receiving the list, the pupil may request to take an examination in each particular course in which core credit has been denied. The school district or charter school shall accept the credit as a core credit for each particular course in which the pupil takes an examination and receives a passing score on a test that is aligned to the competency requirements adopted pursuant to this section and that is designed and evaluated by a teacher in the school district or charter school who teaches the subject matter on which the examination is based. If a pupil is enrolled in a school district or charter school and that pupil also participates in Arizona online instruction between May 1 and July 31, the school district or charter school shall not require proof of payment as a condition of the school district or charter school accepting credits earned from the online course provider. J. The state board of education shall adopt rules to allow high school pupils who can demonstrate competency in a particular academic course or subject to obtain academic credit for the course or subject without enrolling in the course or subject. K. Pupils who earn a Grand Canyon diploma pursuant to article 6 of this chapter are exempt from the graduation requirements prescribed in this section. Pupils who earn a Grand Canyon diploma are entitled to all the rights and privileges of persons who graduate with a high school diploma issued pursuant to this section, including access to postsecondary scholarships and other forms of student financial aid and access to all forms of postsecondary education.  Notwithstanding any other law, a pupil who is eligible for a Grand Canyon diploma may elect to remain in high school through grade twelve and shall not be prevented from enrolling at a high school after the pupil becomes eligible for a Grand Canyon diploma.  A pupil who is eligible for a Grand Canyon diploma and who elects not to pursue one of the options prescribed in section 15-792.03 may only be readmitted to that high school or another high school in this state pursuant to policies adopted by the school district of readmission. L. Pupils who earn a trade pathways diploma pursuant to section 15-217.03 are exempt from the graduation requirements prescribed in this section.  Pupils who earn a trade pathways diploma are entitled to all the rights and privileges of persons who graduate with a high school diploma issued pursuant to this section, including access to postsecondary scholarships and other forms of student financial aid and access to all forms of postsecondary education. L. M. Each school district and charter school shall report to the department of education all of the following aggregate data, organized by grade level, relating to the test that is identical to the civics portion of the naturalization test used by the United States citizenship and immigration services required by subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section: 1. The median score. 2. The percentage of pupils who passed by correctly answering the minimum number of questions required to pass the test pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section. 3. The percentage of pupils who failed by correctly answering fewer than the minimum number of questions required to pass the test pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 3 of this section. 4. Any other data required by the department relating to the test. M. N. A school district or charter school may not include the personally identifiable information of any pupil in the data reported to the department of education under subsection L  M of this section. The department of education shall make the data publicly available, organized at a minimum by school district or charter school and grade level, on the website that includes the school report cards required by section 15-746. END_STATUTE